apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="/ਹੋ__vbser">
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਗਾ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਗੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਂਗੇ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਗਾ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਂਗੇ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਗੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਗਾ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਂਗੇ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਗੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਵੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਣਵਾਲਾ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਣਵਾਲੇ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਣਾ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਣੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਣ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ਹਾਂ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹਾਂ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹਨ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <!-- <e><p><l>हैं</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> -->

      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਹੇ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੈ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ਹੈ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੈ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹਨ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਹੋਏ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਏ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਹੋਏ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੁੰਦਾ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੁੰਦੇ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੁੰਦੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੁੰਦੀਆਂ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਹੋਕਰ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਹੋਕਰ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਨ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸੀ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਸਨ</l><r>ਹੋ<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਹੋ"><i></i><par n="/ਹੋ__vbser"/></e>
